Hawaii, session 2025, SB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 251-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is levied and shall be assessed and collected each month a rental motor vehicle surcharge tax of $5 a day, or any portion of a day that a rental motor vehicle is rented or leased.  When a rental motor vehicle is rented or leased for a portion of a day, the tax under this section shall be assessed at a rate of $0.25 per half-hour, or any portion of a half‑hour, that a rental motor vehicle is rented or leased; provided that for each rental of six hours or more, the tax shall be assessed at the full rate specified in this section. Beginning January 1, 2022, and each subsequent year on January 1 until December 31, 2027, the rental motor vehicle surcharge tax shall increase by $0.50.   The rental motor vehicle surcharge tax shall be levied upon the lessor; provided that the tax shall not be levied on the lessor if: (1)  The lessor is renting the vehicle to replace a vehicle of the lessee that: (A)  Is being repaired; or (B)  Has been stolen and is unrecovered or will not be repaired due to a total loss of the vehicle; and (2)  A record of the repair order, the stolen vehicle record, or total loss vehicle claim for the vehicle is retained either by the lessor for two years for verification purposes or by a motor vehicle repair dealer for two years as provided in section 437B-16. In addition to the requirements imposed by section 251-4, a lessor shall disclose, to the department, the portion of the remittance attributed to the county in which the motor vehicle was operated under rental or lease.  A peer-to-peer car-sharing program, as defined in chapter 279L, shall be subject to the tax imposed by this subsection and be subject to the other requirements of this chapter." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.